Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 9 Fair Employment Practices

Employee's remedy for a discriminatory discharge was under this chapter

and not as a court-imposed separate tort action premised on public policy. Allen v. Safeway Stores, 699 P.2d 277,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 479

(Wyo. 1985), overruled in part, Hoflund v. Airport Golf Club, 2005 WY 17, 105 P.3d 1079,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2005).

Non-discriminatory reasons as pretext for handicap discrimination.—

Employer violated the Act where although the employer demonstrated a legitimate, non-discriminatory reason for hiring the new branch manager, under a burden of going forward with the evidence, the employee ultimately established that the employer's explanations of why the new branch manager was more qualified were simply a pretext for handicap discrimination. World Mart v. Ditsch, 855 P.2d 1228,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1993).

Only unconditional offer tolls liability for back pay. —

Only employer's unconditional offer of reinstatement would have tolled employer's liability for back pay to employee who was subject of discrimination, and where employer's offer was clearly contingent on employees withdrawal of his handicap discrimination claims, the employer's liability for back pay was not tolled. World Mart v. Ditsch, 855 P.2d 1228,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1993).

Deduction of unemployment benefits. —

Refusal of the hearing officer to deduct employee's unemployment benefits from the back pay award was based on the majority rule and did not result in making employee “more whole” than he would have been if he had not been the victim of a handicap discrimination. World Mart v. Ditsch, 855 P.2d 1228,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1993).

Arbitration not required. —

Neither the collective bargaining agreement nor the Railway Labor Act required arbitration of plaintiff's individual statutory claims for sexual harassment and hostile working conditions. Bintner v. Burlington N., 857 F. Supp. 1484, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10628 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Sally Forth into Court — Procedures for the Sexual Harassment Case,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 501 (1987).

For casenote, “Employment Discrimination — The After-Acquired Evidence Doctrine and its Effect on Recovery in Employment Discrimination Claims. McKennon v. Nashville Banner Publishing Co., 513 U.S. 352, 115 S. Ct. 879, 130 L. Ed. 2d 852, 1995 U.S. LEXIS 699 (1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 663 (1996)

For article, “Wyoming Employment Law,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 775 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d Wrongful Discharge § 1 et seq.

Liability for discharging at-will employee for refusing to participate in, or for disclosing, unlawful or unethical acts of employer or co-employees, 9 ALR4th 329.

Failure to pursue or exhaust remedies under union contract as affecting employee's right of state civil action for retaliatory discharge, 32 ALR4th 350.

Recovery for discharge from employment in retaliation for filing workers' compensation claim, 32 ALR4th 1221.

Damages recoverable for wrongful discharge of at-will employee, 44 ALR4th 1131.

Liability of employer, supervisor or manager for intentionally or recklessly causing employee emotional distress, 52 ALR4th 853.

Accommodation requirement under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap, 76 ALR4th 310.

Liability for discharge of at-will employee for refusal to submit to drug testing, 79 ALR4th 105.

Discrimination “because of handicap” or “on the basis of handicap” under state statutes prohibiting job discrimination on account of handicap, 81 ALR4th 144.

In-house counsel's right to maintain action for wrongful discharge, 16 ALR5th 239.

When statute of limitations commences to run as to cause of action for wrongful discharge, 19 ALR5th 439.

Pre-emption of wrongful discharge cause of action by civil rights laws, 21 ALR5th 1.

After-acquired evidence of employee's misconduct as barring or limiting recovery in action for wrongful discharge, 34 ALR5th 699.

Liability for discharge of employee from private employment on ground of political views or conduct, 38 ALR5th 39.

Application of state law to age discrimination in employment, 51 ALR5th 1.

Workers' compensation as precluding employee's suit against employer for sexual harassment in the workplace, 51 ALR5th 163.

Negligent discharge of employee, 53 ALR5th 219.

Compensability of specially equipped van or vehicle under workers' compensation statutes, 63 ALR5th 163.

What will be deemed a “written interpretation or opinion of the commission” which employer can assert as defense under § 713(b) of the Equal Employment Opportunity Act (42 USC § 2000e-12(b)(1)), 54 ALR Fed 868.

Admiralty: recovery for retaliatory discharge of at-will maritime employee, 62 ALR Fed 790.

Dismissal of, or other adverse personnel action relating to, public employee for political patronage reasons as violative of first amendment, 70 ALR Fed 371.

Who is “qualified” handicapped person protected from employment discrimination under Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 USC §§ 701 et seq.) and regulations promulgated thereunder, 80 ALR Fed 830.

Effect of mixed or dual motives in actions under title VII (equal employment opportunities subchapter) of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.), 83 ALR Fed 268.

Nature and burden of proof in title VII action alleging favoritism in promotion of job assignment due to sexual or romantic relationship between supervisor and another, 86 ALR Fed 230.

Prohibition or limitation on display of signs by employees as unfair labor practice, 86 ALR Fed 321.

Recording of collective bargaining or grievance proceeding as unfair labor practice, 86 ALR Fed 844.

Employee's protection under § 15(a)(3) of Fair Labor Standards Act (29 USC § 215(a)(3)), 101 ALR Fed 220.

When does adverse employment decision based on person's foreign accent constitute national origin discrimination in violation of title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e et seq.), 104 ALR Fed 816.

Protection of debtor from acts of discrimination by private entity under § 525(b) of Bankruptcy Code of 1978 (11 USC § 525(b)), 105 ALR Fed 555.

Damages for allegedly wrongful interference with employment rights as received “on account of personal injuries,” so as to be excludible from income tax under 26 USC § 104(a)(2), 106 ALR Fed 321.

Period of time covered by back pay award under Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.), 137 ALR Fed 1.

Increase, or promise of increase, or withholding of increase, of wages as unfair labor practice under National Labor Relations Act, 137 ALR Fed 333.

“Mass discharge” of employees as evidence of unfair labor practice under §§ 9(a)(1) and (3) of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 158(a)(1), (3)), 137 ALR Fed 445.

Who is “employer” within meaning of Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (29 USC § 621 et seq.), 137 ALR Fed 551.

Factors or conditions in employment discrimination cases said to justify increase in attorney's fees awarded under § 706(k) of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e-5(k), 140 ALR Fed 301.

Who is “qualified individual” under Americans With Disabilities Act provisions defining, and extending protection against employment discrimination to qualified individual with disability (42 U.S.C. §§ 12111(8), 12112(a)), 146 ALR Fed 1.

To what extent are federal entities subject to suit under § 504(a) of Rehabilitation Act (42 U.S.C. § 794(a)), which prohibits any program or activity conducted by any executive agency or the postal service from discriminating on basis of disability, 146 ALR Fed 319.

Additions to back pay awards under Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.), 146 ALR Fed 403.

What constitutes reverse or majority race or national origin discrimination violative of federal constitution or statutes — private employment cases 150 ALR Fed 1.

Punitive damages in actions for violations of Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 1981a; 42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.), 150 ALR Fed 601.

What constitutes racial harassment in employment violative of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.), 156 ALR Fed 1.

When is supervisor's hostile environment sexual harassment under Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.) imputable to employer, 157 ALR Fed 1.

§ 27-9-101.
Short title.

This article may be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Fair Employment Practices Act of 1965.”

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-257.

Purpose. —

The title to the Fair Employment Practices Act, which reads in part “An act for the establishment of a Wyoming Fair Employment Commission for the investigation and determination of discriminatory and unfair employment practices against persons otherwise qualified because of sex, race, creed, color, national origin or ancestry …,” gives every indication that its purpose is to prevent discriminating practices against females in all employments when they are qualified to hold a position. And where there is a manifest legislative intent that a subsequent general statute shall have universal application, it repeals by implication earlier laws dealing with only a small part of the same subject. Longacre v. State, 448 P.2d 832,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1968).

Provisions have no application to appointment of deputy sheriff.

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

Hoflund v. Airport Golf Club, 2005 WY 17, 105 P.3d 1079,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(2005).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Employment Discrimination in Wyoming: A New Legal Frontier,” see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 487 (1977).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Same-sex sexual harassment under state antidiscrimination laws, 73 ALR5th 1.

Visual impairment as handicap or disability under state employment discrimination law, 77 ALR5th 595.

Individual liability of supervisors, managers, officers or co-employees for discriminatory actions under state 83 ALR5th 1.

Effect of prior state court judgment upon action in Federal District Court for unlawful employment practices under Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.), 51 ALR Fed 829.

Who has “participated” in investigation, proceeding, or hearing and is thereby protected from retaliation under § 704(a) of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000E-3(a)), 149 ALR Fed 431.

Factors or conditions in employment discrimination cases said to justify decrease in attorney's fees awarded under § 706(k) of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e-5(k)), 151 ALR Fed 77.

Award of compensatory damages under
42 USC § 1981a for violation of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964,
154 ALR Fed 347.

Construction and application of § 102(d) of Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12112(d)) pertaining to medical examinations and inquiries, 159 ALR Fed 89.

Propriety of treating separate entities as one for determining number of employees required by Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000e(b)) for action against “employer,” 160 ALR Fed 441.

What constitutes reverse or majority gender discrimination against males violative of federal constitution or statutes — private employment cases, 162 ALR Fed 273.

Action under Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 et seq.), to remedy alleged harassment or hostile work environment, 162 ALR Fed 603.

Liability of employer, under Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.) for sexual harassment of employee by customer, client, or patron, 163 ALR Fed 445.

What constitutes employment discrimination by public entity in violation of Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA), 42 U.S.C. § 12132, 164 ALR Fed 433.

§ 27-9-102.
Definitions.

“Court” shall mean the district court in and for the judicial district of the state of Wyoming in which the asserted unfair employment practice occurred, or, if said court be not in session at that time, then any judge of said court.

“Employer” shall mean the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision or board, commission, department, institution or school district thereof, and every other person employing two (2) or more employees within the state; but it does not mean religious organizations or associations. “Employer” shall include those divisions of the Wyoming military department that are authorized by federal authority.

“Unfair employment practice” shall mean those practices specified as discriminatory or unfair in W.S.

27-9-105

.

As used in W.S.

27-9-101

through

27-9-106

, “department” means the department of workforce services and the term “director” means the director of the department or his designee who is authorized to administer W.S.

27-9-101

through

27-9-106

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 170, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-258; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2001, ch. 162, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2022 ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (d).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the last sentence in (b).

Cited

in

Hoflund v. Airport Golf Club, 2005 WY 17, 105 P.3d 1079,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sex discrimination in law enforcement and corrections employment, 53 ALR Fed 31.

Validity, construction and application of provisions of § 702 of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e-1) exempting activities of religious organizations from operation of title VII equal employment opportunity provisions, 67 ALR Fed 874.

Meaning of term “employer” as defined in § 701(b) of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended (42 USC § 2000e(b)), 69 ALR Fed 191.

Who is “employee” within meaning of Age Discrimination in Employment Act (29 USC §§ 621-634), 69 ALR Fed 700.

Who is “employee,” as defined in § 701(f) of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 USC § 2000e(f), 72 ALR Fed 522.

Who, other than specifically excluded persons, is “employee” under § 4(a)(1) of Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (29 USC § 623(a)(1)), 125 ALR Fed 273.

Who is “employer” within meaning of Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (29 USC § 621 et seq.), 137 ALR Fed 551.

Propriety of treating separate entities as one for determining number of employees required by Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000e(b)) for action against “employer,” 160 ALR Fed 441.

§ 27-9-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to department of employment being the successor agency to the Wyoming fair employment commission, see § 27-9-102(d).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws, 1965, ch. 170, § 3, related to the creation of the fair employment commission.

§ 27-9-104.
Powers and duties of department of employment.

The department shall have the following powers and duties:

To call upon any state agency, institution, or employee, for advice, counsel, and assistance in the enforcement of this article;

To adopt, publish, amend, and rescind regulations consistent with and for the enforcement of this article;

To receive, investigate, and determine the validity of complaints alleging discrimination in employment or the existence of a discriminatory or unfair employment practice;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 2.

For the purposes of all counseling, mediation or investigations the department shall have the power to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of any books, papers, documents or records that the department deems relevant or material to the inquiry or determination;

In case of disobedience to a subpoena the department may invoke the aid of any district court in the state in requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of court;

To enter into agreements, exchange information and otherwise assist the equal employment opportunity commission, and to accept from the equal employment opportunity commission reimbursement for services rendered;

To enter into agreements, exchange information and otherwise assist the Wyoming military department to counsel, mediate, investigate and determine claims by members of the Wyoming national guard and employees of the military department. As used in this paragraph, “claims” means claims under this chapter or claims under the federal laws enforced by the equal employment opportunity commission, as applicable. The department shall promulgate rules that coordinate with the military department rules promulgated under W.S. 19-7-103(b)(xxv) to accomplish the powers and duties in this paragraph and W.S. 19-7-103(b)(xxv), consistent with equal employment opportunity commission rules and requirements and federal law.

The department shall contract with an independent hearing officer to conduct any hearing under W.S.

27-9-101

through

27-9-106

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 170, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 27-260; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2001, ch. 162, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; 2003, ch. 186, § 1; 2022 ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to a subpoena duces tecum, see Rules 30(b) and 34, W.R.C.P.

As to subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses or for the production of documentary evidence, see Rule 45, W.R.C.P.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(v), added “counseling, mediation or,” substituted “that” for “which,” added “or determination”; and added (a)(viii).

Applied

in

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

World Mart, Inc. v. Ditsch, 855 P.2d 1228,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1993); Hoflund v. Airport Golf Club, 2005 WY 17, 105 P.3d 1079,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(2005).

§ 27-9-105.
Discriminatory and unfair employment practices enumerated; limitations.

It is a discriminatory or unfair employment practice:

For an employer to refuse to hire, to discharge, to promote or demote, or to discriminate in matters of compensation or the terms, conditions or privileges of employment against, a qualified disabled person or any person otherwise qualified, because of age, sex, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry or pregnancy;

For a person, an employment agency, a labor organization, or its employees or members, to discriminate in matters of employment or membership against any person, otherwise qualified, because of age, sex, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry or pregnancy, or a qualified disabled person;

For an employer to reduce the wage of any employee to comply with this chapter;

For an employer to require as a condition of employment that any employee or prospective employee use or refrain from using tobacco products outside the course of his employment, or otherwise to discriminate against any person in matters of compensation or the terms, conditions or privileges of employment on the basis of use or nonuse of tobacco products outside the course of his employment unless it is a bona fide occupational qualification that a person not use tobacco products outside the workplace. Nothing within this paragraph shall prohibit an employer from offering, imposing or having in effect a health, disability or life insurance policy distinguishing between employees for type or price of coverage based upon the use or nonuse of tobacco products if:

Differential rates assessed employees reflect an actual differential cost to the employer; and

Employers provide written notice to employees setting forth the differential rates imposed by insurance carriers.

The prohibitions against discrimination based on age in this section apply only to persons at least forty (40) years of age.

It is not a discriminatory practice for an employer, employment agency or labor organization to observe the terms of a bona fide seniority system or any bona fide employee benefit plan such as a retirement, pension or insurance plan, which is not a subterfuge to evade the purposes of this chapter, except that no employee benefit plan shall excuse the failure to hire any individual, and no seniority system or employee benefit plan shall require or permit involuntary retirement of any individual protected under this chapter because of age. Involuntary retirement is not prohibited if permitted under Title 29, United States Code § 631(c).

As used in this section “qualified disabled person” means a disabled person who is capable of performing a particular job, or who would be capable of performing a particular job with reasonable accommodation to his disability.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 170, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-261; Laws 1984, ch. 7, § 1; 1985, ch. 5, § 1; 1992, ch. 81, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 1; 2003, ch. 188, § 1; 2007, ch. 175, § 1.

Source. —

Subsection (a)(iv), inserted in 1992, is based on a Rhode Island statute.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “ancestry or pregnancy” for “or ancestry” in (a)(i) and (ii).

Provisions plain and unambiguous, containing no exceptions.—

The Fair Employment Practices Act is plain and unambiguous. It contains no exceptions. It clearly makes it unlawful for an employer to: (1) refuse to hire any person otherwise qualified because of sex; (2) discharge any person otherwise qualified because of sex; (3) promote or demote any person otherwise qualified because of sex; or (4) discriminate in matters of compensation against any person otherwise qualified because of sex. Longacre v. State, 448 P.2d 832,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1968).

Provisions have no application to appointment of deputy sheriff.

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

Commission has no independent judgment as to qualifications.—

While neither the supreme court nor the district court, in examining the action of the Wyoming fair employment commission, should make an independent judgment on the facts presented to the commission, similarly the commission was not empowered to exercise an independent judgment as to the merits and qualifications of the applicants for a teaching position with a county school district. Shenefield v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 544 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1976).

Discretionary power of school board as to qualifications. —

The Wyoming fair employment commission had before it no substantial evidence indicating discrimination against complainant because of her sex and the decision made by the school board to hire the male teacher was within its discretionary power to determine the qualifications of prospective teachers in light of its own special problems. Shenefield v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 544 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1976).

Selection of one more able to assist in conduct of school's athletic programs cannot be considered sex discrimination.

Shenefield v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 544 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1976).

Nor is selection of less qualified and less costly teacher.—

If it turns out that for reasons of economy one applicant for a teaching position can fulfill the needs of the district at a cost substantially less than another applicant, even though the rejected applicant may on paper possess the greater qualifications, a selection of the less expensive teacher cannot be said by any board or court to have been the result of discrimination on the basis of sex. Shenefield v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 544 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1976).

Sexual harassment suit unsuccessful. —

Plaintiff's public policy tort claim under this section for constructive discharge from municipal police office for sexual harassment was properly dismissed because plaintiff's emotional injuries were otherwise compensated under Wyoming's worker's compensation laws, and a separate legal remedy was available under Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USCS § 2000e-2(a)(1). Ball v. City of Cheyenne, 845 F. Supp. 803, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19315 (D. Wyo. 1993), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 54 F.3d 664, 1995 U.S. App. LEXIS 15055 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1995).

Decision res judicata. —

The decision of the employment security commission that an employee was not discriminated against on account of her religious practices is a bar to relitigation of that issue before the fair employment commission under the doctrine of res judicata. Salt Creek Freightways v. Wyoming Fair Employment Practices Comm'n, 598 P.2d 435,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 439

(Wyo. 1979).

Summary judgment. —

Hearing officer properly granted the employer summary judgment in the 59-year-old employee's age discrimination action arising out of his termination, where evidence failed to counter a supervisor's assertions that at times the employee could not be found at work when he was scheduled to be there and did not change his behavior after being specifically instructed to do so. The employee failed to show that the employer's reason for terminating him was pretextual because, other than the employee's assertion that the supervisor made a discriminatory statement early on in the supervisor's tenure, the employee provided no details about the context or timing of the supervisor's ageist comments, and none of the employee's submissions indicated that the supervisor's remarks were made in connection with his discharge.
Rollins v. Wyo. Tribune-Eagle, 2007 WY 28, 152 P.3d 367,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2007).

Claim preclusion. —

Plaintiff former employee's suit against defendant former employer for constructive discharge based on gender discrimination and retaliation under 42 USCS § 2000e-2 and this section, was barred, under the doctrine of claim preclusion, by the former employee's prior suit for equal pay under the Equal Pay Act of the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 USCS § 206(d) and 42 USCS 1983, as the second suit arose from the same employment relationship and constituted the same transaction or series of transactions for claim preclusion purposes. Wilkes v. Wyo. Dep't of Empl. Div. of Labor Stds., 314 F.3d 501, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 27263 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2002), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 826, 124 S. Ct. 181, 157 L. Ed. 2d 48, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 6099 (U.S. 2003).

Cited

in

Martinez v. State, 218 F.3d 1133,

2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 17319

(10th Cir. 2000); Hoflund v. Airport Golf Club, 2005 WY 17, 105 P.3d 1079,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(2005); Apodaca v. Safeway, Inc., 2015 WY 51,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Mar. 31, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Americans with Disabilities Act: An Introduction for Lawyers and Judges,” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 175 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What businesses or establishments falling within state civil rights statute provisions prohibiting discrimination, 87 ALR2d 120.

Recovery of damages for emotional distress resulting from discrimination because of sex or marital status, 61 ALR3d 944.

Recovery of damages as remedy for wrongful discrimination under state or local civil rights provisions, 85 ALR3d 351.

Application of state law to sex discrimination in employment, 87 ALR3d 93.

What constitutes unfair labor practice under state public employee relations acts, 9 ALR4th 20.

Modern status of rule that employer may discharge at will employee for any reason, 12 ALR4th 544, 32 ALR4th 1221, 33 ALR4th 120.

On-the-job sexual harassment as violation of state civil rights law, 18 ALR4th 328.

What constitutes employment discrimination on basis of “marital status” for purposes of state civil rights laws, 44 ALR4th 1044.

Discipline or discharge for sexual conduct as violative of state fair employment laws, 47 ALR4th 863.

Handicap as job disqualification under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap, 78 ALR4th 265.

What constitutes handicap under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap, 82 ALR4th 26.

Effectiveness of employer's disclaimer of representations in personnel manual or employee handbook altering at-will employment relationship, 17 ALR5th 1.

Judicial construction and application of state legislation prohibiting religious discrimination in employment, 37 ALR5th 349.

Application of state law to age discrimination in employment, 51 ALR5th 1.

Workers' compensation as precluding employee's suit against employer for sexual harassment in the workplace, 51 ALR5th 163.

Visual impairment as handicap or disability under state employment discrimination law, 77 ALR5th 595.

Availability and scope of punitive damages under state employment discrimination law, 81 ALR5th 367.

Validity, construction, and application of state enactment, order, or regulation expressly prohibiting sexual orientation discrimination, 82 ALR5th 1.

Individual liability of supervisors, managers, officers or co-employees for discriminatory actions under state Civil Rights Act, 83 ALR5th 1.

When is supervisor's or coemployee's hostile environment sexual harassment imputable to employer under state law, 94 ALR5th 1.

Discrimination against pregnant employee as violation of state fair employment laws, 99 ALR5th 1.

What constitutes substantial limitation on major life activity of working for purposes of state civil rights acts, 102 ALR5th 1.

Necessity of, and what constitutes, employer's reasonable accommodation of employee's religious preference under state law, 107 ALR5th 623.

Liability of Employer, Supervisor, or Manager for Intentionally or Recklessly Causing Employee Emotional Distress - Ethnic, Racial, or Religious Harassment or Discrimination. 19 A.L.R.6th 1.

Liability of Employer, Supervisor, or Manager for Intentionally or Recklessly Causing Employee Emotional Distress - Sexual Harassment, Sexual Discrimination, or Accusations Concerning Sexual Conduct or Orientation. 20 A.L.R.6th 1.

Sex discrimination in law enforcement and corrections employment, 53 ALR Fed 31.

Effect of broadcaster's employment practices on renewal of broadcaster's radio license, 56 ALR Fed 49.

Proving that discharge was because of age for purposes of Age Discrimination in Employment Act (29 USC § 621 et seq.), 58 ALR Fed 94.

Liability under title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.) of employer, as successor employer, for discriminatory employment practices of predecessor, 67 ALR Fed 806.

Disparate impact test for sex discrimination in employment under title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.), 68 ALR Fed 19.

Meaning of term “employer” as defined in § 701(b) of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended (42 USC § 2000e(b)), 69 ALR Fed 191.

Who is “employee” within meaning of Age Discrimination in Employment Act (29 USC §§ 621-634), 69 ALR Fed 700.

“Bona fide employee benefit plan” exception to general prohibition of age discrimination in employment (29 USC § 623(f)(2)), 70 ALR Fed 110.

Pre-emption of state fair employment laws under provisions of § 514 of Employee Retirement Income Security Act (29 USC § 1144), 72 ALR Fed 489.

Who is “employee,” as defined in § 701(f) of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 USC § 2000e(f), 72 ALR Fed 522.

Discoverability and admissibility of plaintiff's past sexual behavior in Title VII sexual harassment action, 73 ALR Fed 748.

When is work environment intimidating, hostile or offensive, so as to constitute sexual harassment in violation of title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.), 78 ALR Fed 252.

Actions under Age Discrimination in Employment Act (29 USC §§ 621-634) challenging hiring or retirement practices in law enforcement employment, 79 ALR Fed 373.

Actionability, under federal and state antidiscrimination legislation, of foreign employer's discriminating in favor of foreign workers in hiring and other employment matters, 84 ALR Fed 114.

Circumstances which warrant finding of constructive discharge in cases under Age Discrimination in Employment Act (29 USC § 621 et seq.), 93 ALR Fed 10.

Who is “individual with handicaps” under Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 USC § 701 et seq.), 97 ALR Fed 40.

What statute of limitations applies in actions under § 504 of Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 USC § 794), 120 ALR Fed 621.

What constitutes reasonable accommodation of otherwise qualified employee or applicant who is disabled by drug or alcohol addiction, 122 ALR Fed 111.

Sex discrimination in job assignment or transfer as violation of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e et seq.), 123 ALR Fed 1.

When must specialized equipment or other workplace modifications be provided to qualified disabled employee or applicant as reasonable accommodation, 125 ALR Fed 629.

Employee's retention of benefits received in consideration of promise not to enforce claims under Age Discrimination in Employment Act as ratification of otherwise invalid or voidable waiver under § 7(f)(1) of act (29 USC § 626(f)(1)), 128 ALR Fed 577.

Increase, or promise of increase, or withholding of increase, of wages as unfair labor practice under National Labor Relations Act, 137 ALR Fed 333.

“Mass discharge” of employees as evidence of unfair labor practice under §§ 9(a)(1) and (3) of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 158(a)(1), (3)), 137 ALR Fed 445.

Who is “employer” within meaning of Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (29 USC § 621 et seq.), 137 ALR Fed 551.

Factors or conditions in employment discrimination cases said to justify increase in attorney's fees awarded under § 706(k) of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e-5(k), 140 ALR Fed 301.

What constitutes substantial limitation on major life activity of working for purposes of Americans with Disabilities Act (42 USC §§ 12101-12213), 141 ALR Fed 603.

When does job restructuring constitute reasonable accommodation of qualified disabled employee or applicant?, 142 ALR Fed 311.

Conduct of plaintiff as defense in action for employment discrimination based on sexual harassment under federal civil rights statutes, 145 ALR Fed 459.

What constitutes religious harassment in employment in violation of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.), 149 ALR Fed 405.

Punitive damages in actions for violations of Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C.A. § 1981a; 42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.), 150 ALR Fed 601.

Factors or conditions in employment discrimination cases said to justify decrease in attorney's fees awarded under § 706(k) of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000e-5(k)), 151 ALR Fed 77.

What constitutes reverse or majority gender discrimination against males violative of federal constitution or statutes — public employment cases,
153 ALR Fed 609.

Award of compensatory damages under
42 USC § 1981a for violation of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964,
154 ALR Fed 347.

What constitutes direct evidence of age discrimination in action under age discrimination in employment act (29 U.S.C. §§ 621 et seq.) — Post-Price Waterhouse cases 155 ALR Fed 283.

What constitutes racial harassment in employment violative of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.), 156 ALR Fed 1.

When is supervisor's hostile environment sexual harassment under Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.) imputable to employer, 157 ALR Fed 1.

Construction and application of § 102(d) of Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12112(d)) pertaining to medical examinations and inquiries, 159 ALR Fed 89.

What constitutes reverse or majority gender discrimination against males violative of federal constitution or statutes — private employment cases, 162 ALR Fed 273.

Action under Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 et seq.), to remedy alleged harassment or hostile work environment, 162 ALR Fed 603.

Liability of employer, under Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.) for sexual harassment of employee by customer, client, or patron, 163 ALR Fed 445.

What constitutes “willful violation” under age discrimination in employment act (29 U.S.C. §§ 626 et seq.) entitling victim to liquidated damages, 165 ALR Fed 1.

Can “at-will” employee bring action for racial discrimination under 42 U.S.C. § 1981, 165 ALR Fed 143.

Preemption of state law wrongful discharge claim, not arising from whistleblowing, by § 541(a) of Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. § 1144(a)), 176 ALR Fed 433.

“Bona fide employee benefit plan” exception to general prohibition of Age Discrimination in Employment Act (29 U.S.C.A. § 623(f)(2)(B)) as applied to plans other than early retirement incentive plans, 184 ALR Fed 1.

Disparate impact claims under Age Discrimination Act of 1967, §§ 2 et seq., 29 U.S.C.A. §§ 621 et seq., 186 ALR Fed 1.

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law § 52.06 (Matthew Bender).